North Dakota statutes. TITLE 47 Property
CHAPTER 47-30.2 Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act
47-30.2-58.
(1005) Evidence of unpaid debt or undischarged obligation.

A record of a putative holder showing an unpaid debt or undischarged obligation is prima facie evidence of the debt or obligation.

A putative holder may establish by a preponderance of the evidence that there is no unpaid debt or undischarged obligation for a debt or obligation described in subsection 1 or that the debt or obligation was not, or no longer is, a fixed and certain obligation of the putative holder.

A putative holder may overcome prima facie evidence under subsection 1 by establishing by a preponderance of the evidence that a check, draft, or similar instrument was:

Issued as an unaccepted offer in settlement of an unliquidated amount;

Issued but later was replaced with another instrument because the earlier instrument was lost or contained an error that was corrected;

Issued to a party affiliated with the issuer;

Paid, satisfied, or discharged;

Issued in error;

Issued without consideration;

Issued but there was a failure of consideration;

Voided not later than ninety days after issuance for a valid business reason set forth in a contemporaneous record; or

Issued but not delivered to the third-party payee for a sufficient reason recorded within a reasonable time after issuance.

In asserting a defense under this section, a putative holder may present evidence of a course of dealing between the putative holder and the apparent owner or of custom and practice.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-59.
(1006) Failure of person examined to retain records.

If a person subject to examination under section 47-30.2-55 fails to retain the records required by section 47-30.2-24, the administrator may determine the value of property due using a reasonable method of estimation based on all information available to the administrator, including extrapolation and use of statistical sampling when appropriate and necessary, consistent with examination procedures and standards adopted under subsection 1 of section 47-30.2-56 and in accord with subsection 2 of section 47-30.2-56.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-60.
(1007) Report to person whose records were examined.

At the conclusion of an examination under section 47-30.2-55, the administrator or the administrator’s agent shall provide to the person whose records were examined a complete and unredacted examination report that specifies:

The work performed;

The property types reviewed;

The methodology of any estimation technique, extrapolation, or statistical sampling used in conducting the examination;

Each calculation showing the value of property determined to be due; and

The findings of the person conducting the examination.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-61.
(1008) Informal conference during examination.

If a person subject to examination under section 47-30.2-55 believes the person conducting the examination has made an unreasonable or unauthorized request or is not proceeding expeditiously to complete the examination, the person subject to the examination may ask the administrator to intervene and take appropriate remedial action, including countermanding the request of the person conducting the examination, imposing a time limit for completion of the examination, or reassigning the examination to another person.

If a person subject to the examination requests a conference with the administrator to present matters that are the basis of a request under subsection 1, the administrator shall hold the conference not later than thirty days after receiving the request. The administrator may hold the conference in person, by telephone, or by electronic means.

If a conference is held under subsection 2, not later than thirty days after the conference ends, the administrator shall provide a report in a record of the conference to the person that requested the conference.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-62.
(1012) Determination of liability for unreported reportable property.

If the administrator determines from an examination conducted under section 47-30.2-55 that a putative holder failed or refused to pay or deliver to the administrator property which is reportable under this chapter, the administrator shall issue a determination of the putative holder’s liability to pay or deliver and give notice of the determination in a record to the putative holder.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-63.
(1202) Interstate and international agreement — Cooperation.

Subject to subsection 2, the administrator may:

Exchange information with another state or foreign country relating to property presumed abandoned or relating to the possible existence of property presumed abandoned; and

Authorize in a record another state or foreign country or a person acting on behalf of the other state or country to examine its records of a putative holder as provided in sections 47-30.2-54, 47-30.2-55, 47-30.2-56, 47-30.2-57, 47-30.2-58, 47-30.2-59, 47-30.2-60, 47-30.2-61, and 47-30.2-62.

An exchange or examination under subsection 1 may be done only if the state or foreign country has confidentiality and security requirements substantially equivalent to those in sections 47-30.2-71, 47-30.2-72, and 47-30.2-73 or agrees in a record to be bound by this state’s confidentiality and security requirements.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-64.
(1203) Action involving another state or foreign country.

The administrator may join another state or foreign country to examine and seek enforcement of this chapter against a putative holder.

The board may pursue an action on behalf of this state to recover property subject to this chapter but delivered to the custody of another state if the administrator believes the property is subject to the custody of the administrator.

The board may retain an attorney in this state, another state, or a foreign country to commence an action to recover property on behalf of the board and may agree to pay attorney’s fees based in whole or in part on a fixed fee, hourly fee, or a percentage of the amount or value of property recovered in the action.

Expenses incurred by this state in an action under this section must be paid in accordance with section 47-30.2-46.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-65.
(1204) Interest and penalty for failure to act in timely manner.

An administrator may collect interest from a holder that fails to report, pay, or deliver property within the time prescribed by this chapter. Interest must be calculated at an annual rate of one percent of the sum for each thirty-day period of delinquency or fraction of delinquency period on the property or value of the property from the date the property should have been reported, paid, or delivered to the administrator until the date reported, paid, or delivered.

Except as otherwise provided in section 47-30.2-66 or 47-30.2-67, the administrator may require a holder that fails to report, pay, or deliver property within the time prescribed by this chapter to pay to the administrator, in addition to interest included under subsection 1, a civil penalty of two hundred dollars for each day the duty is not performed, up to a cumulative maximum amount of five thousand dollars.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-66.
(1205) Other civil penalties.

If a holder enters into a contract or other arrangement for the purpose of evading an obligation under this chapter or otherwise willfully fails to perform a duty imposed on the holder under this chapter, the commissioner may require the holder to pay the administrator, in addition to interest as provided in subsection 1 of section 47-30.2-65, a civil penalty of one thousand dollars for each day the obligation is evaded or the duty is not performed, up to a cumulative maximum amount of twenty-five thousand dollars, plus twenty-five percent of the amount or value of property that should have been, but was not reported, paid, or delivered as a result of the evasion or failure to perform.

If a holder makes a fraudulent report under this chapter, the commissioner may require the holder to pay to the administrator, in addition to interest under subsection of section 47-30.2-65, a civil penalty of one thousand dollars for each day from the date the report was made until corrected, up to a cumulative maximum of twenty-five thousand dollars, plus twenty-five percent of the amount or value of any property that should have been reported, but was not included in the report or was underreported.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-67.
Waiver of interest and penalty.

A holder shall pay the penalty and interest or request a waiver or reduction within thirty days from the date of the receipt of a notice of a penalty and interest assessment.

A request for a waiver or reduction of the penalty or interest must be in writing and provide the grounds for the request.

The following factors may be considered if deciding to waive or reduce the penalty or interest:

The reason for the holder’s noncompliance;

The degree of control the holder had over the lack of compliance;

Any unusual or mitigating circumstances involved; and

Any other relevant factors.

The commissioner may waive up to twenty-five thousand dollars of the penalty or reduce interest. A request for a waiver or reduction of penalty in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars must be presented to the board, with the commissioner’s recommendation, for review and decision.

A waiver or reduction of penalty and interest does not constitute a waiver of the right to seek the full amount of both penalty and interest if the initial holder obligation is not paid. If a claim for penalties and interest is settled and payment received, the amount of penalties and interest not collected is waived.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-68.
(1301) When agreement to locate property enforceable.

An agreement by an apparent owner and another person, the primary purpose of which is to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the location, delivery, or recovery of property held by the administrator, is enforceable only if:

The person who entered into the agreement with the apparent owner is in compliance with chapter 43-30; and

The agreement:

Is in writing;

Clearly states the nature of the property and the services to be provided;

States the amount of the fee or other compensation to be paid, which may not be in excess of ten percent of the amount recovered;

Discloses that, absent the agreement, the property would be delivered to a state-administered unclaimed property program for safekeeping on the owner’s behalf and upon delivery, the owner may be able to recover the property from the state-administered program without charge; and

Is signed by or on behalf of the apparent owner.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-69.
(1302) When agreement to locate property void.

An agreement to locate property is void if:

Subject to subdivision b, the agreement is entered into during the period beginning on the date the property was presumed abandoned and ending twenty-four months after the payment or delivery; or

A provision in an agreement described in subdivision a applies to property that has not yet been abandoned and reported to the administrator, including mineral proceeds.

This section does not apply to an apparent owner’s agreement with an attorney to pursue a claim for recovery of specifically identified property held by the administrator or to contest the administrator’s denial of a claim for recovery of the property.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-70.
(1303) Right of agent of apparent owner to recover property held by administrator.

An apparent owner that contracts with another person to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the location, delivery, or recovery of property of the apparent owner which is held by the administrator may designate the person as the agent of the apparent owner. The designation must be in a record signed by the apparent owner.

The administrator shall give the agent of the apparent owner all information concerning the property which the apparent owner is entitled to receive, including information that otherwise is confidential information.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-71.
(1405) No confidential information in notice.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 47-30.2-26 and 47-30.2-27, a holder is not required under this chapter to include confidential information in a notice the holder is required to provide to an apparent owner under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-72.
(1406) Security of information.

If a holder is required to include confidential information in a report to the administrator, the information must be provided by a secure means.

If confidential information in a record is provided to and maintained by the administrator or administrator’s agent as required by this chapter, the administrator or administrator’s agent shall:

Implement administrative, technical, and physical safeguards to protect the security, confidentiality, and integrity of the information required by state and federal privacy and data security law whether or not the administrator or the administrator’s agent is subject to the law;

Protect against reasonably anticipated threats or hazards to the security, confidentiality, or integrity of the information; and

Protect against unauthorized access to or use of the information which could result in substantial harm or inconvenience to a holder or the holder’s customers, including insureds, annuitants, and policy or contract owners and their beneficiaries.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-73.
(1407) Security breach.

Except to the extent prohibited by law other than this chapter, the administrator or administrator’s agent shall notify a holder as soon as practicable of:

A suspected loss, misuse or unauthorized access, disclosure, modification, or destruction of confidential information obtained from the holder in the possession of the administrator or an administrator’s agent; and

Any interference with operations in any system hosting or housing confidential information which:

Compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of the information; or

Creates a substantial risk of identity fraud or theft.

Except as necessary to inform an insurer, attorney, investigator, or others as required by law, the administrator and an administrator’s agent may not disclose, without the express consent in a record of the holder, an event described in subsection 1 to a person whose confidential information was supplied by the holder.

If an event described in subsection 1 occurs, the administrator and the administrator’s agent shall:

Take action necessary for the holder to understand and minimize the effect of the event and determine its scope; and

Cooperate with the holder with respect to:

Any notification required by law concerning a data or other security breach; and

A regulatory inquiry, litigation, or similar action.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-74.
(1503) Transitional provision — Effect of new provisions — Clarification of application.

This chapter does not relieve a holder of a duty that arose before July 1, 2021, to report, pay, or deliver property. A holder that fails to comply with the law in effect before July 1, 2021, is subject to the applicable enforcement and penalty provisions that existed before July 1, 2021, and the applicable provisions are continued in effect for the purpose of this subsection.

The initial report filed under this chapter for property that was not required to be reported before July 1, 2021, but which is subject to this chapter must include all items of property that would have been presumed abandoned during the ten-year period preceding July 1, 2021, as if this chapter had been in effect during that period.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-75.
Enforcement — Appeals.

The administrator may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce this chapter. A person in this state aggrieved by an audit that in any form requests the payment of money or a civil penalty is entitled to a hearing before the board. A demand for a hearing must be made within thirty days of the request by the administrator. The request by the administrator must contain notice of the right to a hearing. The board’s decision is the final order of the agency and is appealable to the district court. Any amount of money requested by the administrator which may increase over time is tolled at the time of filing an appeal, retroactive to the date of the request.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.